Hawaii statutes.
§657-36 Same. If, when the right of
action first accrues, the person entitled thereto is under any of the
disabilities mentioned in section 657-34, and dies without having recovered the
premises, no further time for making the entry or bringing the action, beyond
what is prescribed in section 657-35, shall be allowed by reason of the
disability of any other person. [L 1870, c 22, §6; RL 1925, §2662; RL 1935,
§3933; RL 1945, §10444; RL 1955, §241-35; HRS §657-36]

Case Notes

Cited: 18 H. 662.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next